Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-1728
Parking facilities; leased for operation; limitation.

Any city of the metropolitan class, any county in which such city is located, or such city and county jointly may construct parking facilities in conjunction with a civic center. When constructed, such parking facilities shall be leased for operation, in which case the lease shall be granted to the highest and best bidder, after publication and notice of such offering for lease in the same manner as required by law for other contracts awarded by the city, county, or city and county. Such facilities shall not be operated by the city, county, or city and county.

Laws 1969, c. 57, § 3, p. 360;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 311.
July 21, 2022